Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 9 Jury Lists

9-9-1.
Persons liable to service — Voting operator’s licenses, Rhode Island identification card, state income tax returns and unemployment compensation as evidence.

A person is liable to serve as a juror if the person is:

A citizen of the United States; and

At least eighteen (18) years of age; and

A resident of Rhode Island who either:

Resides in the county where the person is registered to vote;

Is licensed to operate a motor vehicle within this state; or

Possesses a Rhode Island identification card issued pursuant to the provisions of §§

3-8-6

and

3-8-6

.1; or

Is an individual filing a state income tax return; or

Is an individual recipient of unemployment compensation.

The list of qualified electors of each town and city as made up by the board of canvassers thereof, at its last meeting prior to the Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even numbered year, and the duly certified records of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall be conclusive evidence of the liability of each person to serve as provided in this chapter, unless in the case of a qualified elector the name of the person has been removed from the list of qualified electors of that town or city on which the name of that person appears prior to being summoned to appear in court as a juror, and except as provided in this chapter. The jury commissioner shall notify the clerk of the board of canvassers and registration of each particular city or town when it appears that a person on a list of qualified jurors does not reside at the address on the list. The board of canvassers and registration, after due notice to the person, shall challenge the listing thereof and after a hearing thereon may remove that person from the list.

The division of motor vehicles shall forward to the jury commissioner the names of licensed drivers and the names of those persons who possess Rhode Island identification cards issued pursuant to the provisions of §§

3-8-6

and

3-8-6

.1 in the state on a yearly basis.

The division of taxation shall forward to the jury commissioner the names of all individuals who have filed a state income tax return, on a yearly basis.

The department of labor and training shall forward to the jury commissioner the names of all individuals who are receiving unemployment compensation, on a yearly basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2037, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 1; P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 1; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-1

; P.L. 1972, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 4; P.L. 1980, ch. 242, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 406, § 3; P.L. 1980, ch. 412, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 19; P.L. 2003, ch. 430, § 1.

9-9-1.1.
Qualifications of jurors.

A person is qualified to serve as a juror if the person is:

A citizen of the United States; and

A resident of Rhode Island who either:

Resides in the county where the person is registered to vote; or

Is licensed to operate a motor vehicle within this state; or

Possesses a Rhode Island identification card issued pursuant to the provisions of §§

3-8-6

and

3-8-6

.1; or

Is an individual filing a state income tax return; or

Is an individual recipient of unemployment compensation.

At least 18 years of age;

Able to understand and participate in the court proceedings; and

Physically and mentally capable of performing in a reasonable manner the duties of a juror.

No person shall be allowed to serve as a juror if he or she has been lawfully adjudicated to be non compos mentis.

No person convicted of a felony shall be allowed to serve as a juror, until completion of such felon’s sentence, served or suspended, and of parole or probation regardless of a nolo contendere plea.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(4) and (5), a person with a disability shall not be ineligible to serve as a juror solely on the basis of his or her disability, and if that person meets the above requirements, with reasonable accommodations if necessary, he or she shall be deemed a qualified juror.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the court from disqualifying a prospective juror because he or she lacks a faculty or has a disability which will prevent the potential juror from being a competent juror in a particular case.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a party’s right to preemptorially challenge jurors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 8; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 8; P.L. 2003, ch. 430, § 1.

9-9-1.2.
Interpreters or readers for jury service.

In any proceeding, civil or criminal, the courts shall provide and pay the reasonable costs of services of a qualified interpreter for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing and a reader for persons who are visually impaired when necessary to enable persons with these disabilities to serve as jurors, when such persons are qualified jurors within the meaning of §

9-9-1.1

.

“Qualified interpreter” for this section means an interpreter for the person who is deaf or hard of hearing skilled in sign language or oral interpretation and transliteration, having the ability to communicate accurately with a person who is deaf or hard of hearing. An interpreter shall be deemed qualified as determined by the commission on the deaf and hard of hearing based upon recommendations from the commission and the deaf and hard of hearing interpreter screening committee, the Rhode Island association of the deaf, the national registry of interpreters for the deaf, and other appropriate agencies. The commission on the deaf and hard of hearing shall coordinate all requests for qualified interpreters and shall maintain a list of all such interpreters from which it shall fill the requests.

“Person who is hard of hearing” for this section means a person who, because of a hearing impairment or deafness, requires sign language and/or speech reading as a part of his or her communication system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 150, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 8; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 8.

9-9-2.
Exclusion for race, color, or previous servitude, disability, or gender prohibited.

No citizen, possessing all other qualifications which are or shall be prescribed by law, shall be disqualified for service as a grand or petit juror in any court of this state on account of race, color, or previous condition of servitude, disability, or gender; and any officer or other person, charged with any duty in the selection or summoning of jurors, who shall willfully exclude or fail to select or summon any citizen for any of the causes provided shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 2; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-2

; P.L. 1991, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 8; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 8.

9-9-3.
Persons exempt from service.

The following persons shall be exempted from serving as jurors, unless such persons shall waive their exemption, namely: the members of congress from the state of Rhode Island, the general officers of the state, the members and officers of the general assembly during their tenure of office irrespective of whether the general assembly is in session or not, the jury commissioner and his or her assistants, the justices of the state and United States courts, clerks of those courts, practicing attorneys-at-law, correctional officers, deputy sheriffs, probation and parole officers, members of any paid police force of the state or of any city or town, members of any paid fire department of any city or town, and members of the armed services on active duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 3; P.L. 1922, ch. 2217, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 3; P.L. 1923, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1431, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1516, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1601, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2450, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 242, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 17.

9-9-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 3; P.L. 1922, ch. 2217, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 3; P.L. 1923, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1431, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1516, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1601, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2450, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-4

), was in effect repealed by its omission in the amendment of R.P.L. 1957, ch. 124, § 1.

9-9-5.
Jury commissioner — Term — Appointment and removal.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the position, whether by expiration of the term of office or otherwise, the presiding justice of the superior court, with the concurrence of a majority of the justices of the court, shall have the power to appoint a jury commissioner who shall be a qualified elector of the state, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the presiding justice and a majority of the justices of the superior court. The jury commissioner’s salary shall be determined and set by the unclassified pay plan board and he or she shall be entitled to the same longevity salary increases as though he or she was in the classified service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-5

; P.L. 1995, ch. 321, § 1.

9-9-6.
Vacancies in office of jury commissioner.

Whenever a vacancy shall occur in the office of jury commissioner, the presiding justice of the superior court, with the concurrence of a majority of the justices of the court, shall appoint a jury commissioner. The person so appointed shall hold office at the pleasure of the presiding justice and the majority of the justices of the court. The salary of the jury commissioner so appointed shall be determined and set by the unclassified pay plan board and he or she shall be entitled to the same longevity salary increases as though he or she was in the classified service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-6

; P.L. 1976, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 321, § 1.

9-9-7.
Assistants and expenses of office.

The jury commissioner may, with the consent in writing of the presiding justice, from time to time appoint and remove an associate jury commissioner, an assistant jury commissioner, and such clerks, stenographers, and investigators, and may incur such office and traveling expenses, as shall be necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of his or her office.

The associate jury commissioner and the assistant jury commissioner may discharge all of the duties of the jury commissioner appointing them and an act done by them shall have the same force and effect as though done by the jury commissioner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 281, § 1.

9-9-8 — 9-9-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, §§ 7-9; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, §§ 7-9; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, §§ 6-7; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 951, § 2; G.L., ch. 329, § 7, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, § 2; G.L., ch. 329, § 11, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, § 5; P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, §§ 2-4; P.L. 1930, ch. 1609, §§ 1-4; G.L., 1938, ch. 506, §§ 6-9; § 39; G.L., ch. 506, §§ 5-8, 37, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, §§

9-9-8

— 9-9-14; P.L. 1959, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 51, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 242, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 412, §§ 1, 4; Repealed by P.L. 1975, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 89, § 1; and P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 1, effective May 21, 1975, May 8, 1980, and March 31, 1992, respectively.

9-9-14.1.
Selection of jurors by use of electronic data processing equipment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the jury commissioner may, with approval of the presiding justice of the superior court, select jurors from the registered voters of the several cities and towns as deemed necessary by the jury commission for the several counties of the state by means of the use of electronic data processing equipment, now or hereafter owned or leased by the state of Rhode Island, whenever the secretary of state shall certify to the jury commissioner that the equipment has been furnished with the names of all persons who are registered voters in the cities and towns. In such event, the jury commissioner shall supervise the electronic data processing machine operator in order to carry out the drawing in such a way that neither the jury commissioner nor the operator of the device shall be able to determine any name until the name has actually been drawn. After the drawing has been carried out in accordance herewith, the jury commissioner shall cause the electronic data processing machine operator to have the electronic data processing machine compile a list, by county, randomly mixing the names so drawn. Members of the public and press shall be admitted to the place of electronic data selection, to the extent that space and area may allow.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 2.

9-9-14.2.
Time of selections.

Whenever jurors are drawn by the use of electronic data processing equipment, in accordance with the provisions of §

9-9-14.1

, the drawing shall take place at such dates and times during the month of March of each year as may be selected by the jury commissioner, with the approval of the presiding justice of the superior court, and drawings may be held at other times throughout the year, if deemed necessary by the jury commissioner and the presiding justice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 2.

9-9-15 — 9-9-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, §§ 11-17; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, §§ 11-17; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 8; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, §§ 3, 4; G.L. ch. 329, § 12, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, § 6; P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, §§ 6-8; P.L. 1930, ch. 1609, §§ 5-7; P.L. 1931, ch. 1773, §§ 1-4; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, §§ 10-12, 14-16; G.L. ch. 506, §§ 9-14, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2138, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2334, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3753, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-9-15

— 9-9-21; P.L. 1963, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 51, § 2); Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 1, effective March 31, 1992.

9-9-22.
Period during which names drawn are liable to service as jurors.

The persons whose names are drawn as provided in §§

9-9-14.1

and

9-9-14.2

shall be liable to serve as grand or petit jurors commencing at any time during the year beginning July next after the drawing, whenever notified to appear for such service as provided in chapter 10 of this title; and the persons whose names are so drawn at any other such meeting held in accordance with the provisions of §

9-9-14.2

shall be liable to so serve commencing at any time before July following the date of the drawing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 19; P.L. 1927, ch. 1015, § 6; P.L. 1928, ch. 1192, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 17; G.L., ch. 506, § 15, as enacted by P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-22

; P.L. 1963, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 100.

9-9-23.
Investigation of names drawn — Lists of persons well qualified to serve.

The jury commissioner, either personally or by such assistant as he or she may employ as provided in §

9-9-7

, shall investigate the names of all persons drawn as provided in §

9-9-14.1

, and as far as possible in the order in which the names appear upon the lists. The investigation may be made by the mailing of questionnaires to such persons, or by other written inquiries deemed by the jury commissioner to be appropriate, but where the jury commissioner considers further investigation to be necessary or desirable, the investigation may include a personal interview by the jury commissioner or by one of his or her duly appointed assistants. The jury commissioner shall make lists of all grand and petit jurors for each town not exempted as provided in §

9-9-3

, and in the order in which they were originally drawn, as he or she shall deem well qualified to serve, being persons of good moral character, of sound judgment, and free from all exception, which lists shall be kept on file in the office of the jury commissioner. The jury commissioner shall preserve a full record of the investigation, which shall not be disclosed to any person except by order of a justice of the superior court, or by order of the chief judge or associate justice of the family court, and may summon before him or her any person subject to serve as a juror, or any person who in the jury commissioner’s opinion has particular knowledge of a juror’s fitness to serve as a juror, and for this purpose may administer oaths, and have the same powers as are by law provided for the summoning of witnesses by a coroner. Any person so summoned shall be entitled to the same fees as a witness summoned before a coroner. No rejection of a juror by the jury commissioner shall take final effect until it has been approved by a justice of the superior court, appointed for this purpose by the presiding justice, and he or she may appoint different justices from time to time for each county. A justice of the family court who has been appointed by the chief judge for the purpose of considering the recommendations of the jury commissioner concerning the fitness of jurors may also reject jurors. The chief judge may appoint different justices from time to time for each county.

The jury commissioner shall not place any person upon the list who is not qualified as provided in §

9-9-1.1

, nor shall he or she fail to place any person upon the list who is qualified, and if the commissioner or any of his or her assistants shall willfully violate any of the provisions of this section they shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for the term of not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 20; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 16; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-23

; P.L. 1974, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 100.

9-9-24.
Appeals from jury commissioner.

Any person aggrieved by the decision of the jury commissioner may, within one year from the time when his or her name was drawn, appeal to the superior court, which sitting without a jury, shall hear and determine the appeal and order that the name be placed upon or withdrawn from the list. Notice of the pendency of the appeal shall be given to the jury commissioner by citation. The decision of any justice of the superior court upon the appeal shall be final.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 21; P.L. 1926, ch. 797, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 17; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-24

.

9-9-25.
Application to pending proceedings.

The provisions of this chapter, of chapter 10 of this title, and of chapter 11 of title 12 shall not affect any suit brought, nor any offense committed, nor any penalty or forfeiture incurred before May 11, 1939, and no prosecution or indictment pending on that date shall be affected hereby, except that all proceedings in any such suit or prosecution and in any suit or prosecution thereafter commenced may be conformed to the provisions hereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 39; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-25

.

9-9-26.
Appropriations — Expenses.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it shall deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 10 of this title; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums as may be from time to time required, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the jury commissioner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 40; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-9-26

.

9-9-27.
Retention of jury lists.

Lists and records required to be filed and/or preserved in the office of the jury commissioner by the provisions of this chapter may be destroyed upon order of the presiding justice of the superior court when he or she determines their retention is no longer required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 49, § 1.

9-9-28.
Prohibition against loss of employment or longevity benefits.

No employer doing business within the state of Rhode Island or otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the state of Rhode Island shall cause any of its employees to suffer the loss of the employee’s position, wage increases, promotions, longevity benefit, or any other emolument due to the employer-employee relationship because the employee has been called to serve jury duty; provided, however, that no employer, in the absence of a contract or collective bargaining agreement to the contrary, shall be responsible to pay to the employee any compensation for the period of the jury duty. In addition to all civil rights available to the employee because of this section, a violation of this section upon conviction shall be punishable as a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 186, § 1.

9-9-29.
Public transportation.

The jury commissioner shall establish a procedure whereby, upon request, any serving juror shall be allowed the use of the regularly scheduled services of the Rhode Island public transit authority and the Pawtucket-Providence commuter ferry shuttle service and passage upon the Claiborne Pell Bridge free of charge on each day of the juror’s service. A juror requesting these services shall be given a travel voucher valid for use of the services of the Rhode Island public transit authority or the Pawtucket-Providence commuter ferry shuttle service or tokens valid for passage upon the Claiborne Pell Bridge while he or she is serving as a juror.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 534, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 338, § 1.

9-9-30.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the jury commissioner shall, with the approval of the presiding justice of the superior court, promulgate rules and regulations for the efficient operation of the jury system within the counties of the state. Such rules and regulations shall become final after approval by the supreme court and upon filing in the office of the secretary of state, unless otherwise specified at the time of approval by the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 13, § 3.